Utah statutes.
11-49-706.   Action by political subdivision governing body.

A political subdivision governing body that receives a recommendation in accordance with Section 11-49-704 shall:

(1)  review the recommendation; and

(2)  take further action in accordance with a political subdivision's governing ordinance, bylaws, or other applicable governing rule.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

